Washington statutes.
RCW 43.382.090

Department of social and health services—Department of health—Duties.

The department and the department of health shall:

(1) Allow the ombuds or the ombuds' designee to communicate privately with any person receiving services from the department, or any person who is part of a fatality or near fatality investigation involving a person with developmental disabilities, for the purposes of carrying out its duties under this chapter;

(2) Permit the ombuds or the ombuds' designee physical access to state institutions serving persons with developmental disabilities and information in the possession of the department concerning state-licensed facilities or residences for the purpose of carrying out its duties under this chapter;

(3) Upon the ombuds' request, grant the ombuds or the ombuds' designee the right to access, inspect, and copy all relevant information, records, or documents in the possession or control of the department or the department of health that the ombuds considers necessary in an investigation.

[ 2016 c 172 s 14.]

NOTES:

Finding—2016 c 172: See note following RCW 43.382.005.